Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB681.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 202 and 448(p) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:Section 202. Departmental Administrative Boards, Commissions, and Offices.--The following boards, commissions, and offices are hereby placed and made departmental administrative boards, commissions, or offices, as the case may be, in the respective administrative departments mentioned in the preceding section, as follows:In the Department of State,Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs,State Real Estate Commission,State Board of Medical Education and Licensure,State Board of Physical Therapy Examiners,State Board of Pharmacy,State Dental Council and Examining Board,State Board of Optometrical Examiners,State Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners,State Board of Nurse Examiners,State Board of Barber Examiners,State Board of Cosmetology,State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners,State Board of Chiropractic Examiners,State Board of Podiatry Examiners,State Board of Examiners of Public Accountants,State Board of Examiners of Architects,State Registration Board for Professional Engineers,State Board of Funeral Directors,State Board of Examiners of Nursing Home Administrators,20250SB0681PN0773 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Board of Auctioneer Examiners,State Board of Psychologist Examiners,State Board of Landscape Architects.In the Department of Justice,In the Treasury Department,Board of Finance and Revenue;In the Department of Community Affairs,Board of Property;In the Department of Education,Board of Trustees of Thaddeus Stevens College ofTechnology,Board of Trustees of Scranton State School for the Deaf,Public Service Institute Board,State Board of Private Academic Schools,State Board of Private Licensed Schools,State Board of Education.In the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs,Armory Board of the State of Pennsylvania,Board of Trustees of Scotland School for Veterans'Children.In the Department of Banking and Securities,In the Department of Agriculture,State Farm Products Show Commission;In the Department of Health,In the Department of Labor and Industry,Workmen's Compensation Appeal Board,State Workmen's Insurance Board,The Industrial Board,Unemployment Compensation Board of Review,Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board,20250SB0681PN0773 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Advisory Council on Affairs of the Handicapped;In the Department of Human Services,Board of Trustees of The Western Youth Development Centers,Board of Trustees of The Central Youth Development Centers,Board of Trustees of The Eastern Youth Development Centers,Board of Trustees of Allentown State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Clarks Summit State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Danville State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Embreeville Center,Board of Trustees of Farview State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Harrisburg State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Mayview State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Norristown State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Philadelphia State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Somerset State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Warren State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Wernersville State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Woodville State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Torrance State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Haverford State Hospital,Board of Trustees of Ashland State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Coaldale State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Nanticoke State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Philipsburg State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Scranton State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Shamokin State General Hospital,Board of Trustees of Ebensburg Center,20250SB0681PN0773 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Board of Trustees of Eastern State School and Hospital,Board of Trustees of Laurelton Center,Board of Trustees of Pennhurst Center,Board of Trustees of Polk Center,Board of Trustees of Selinsgrove Center,Board of Trustees of Hamburg Center,Board of Trustees of Western Center,Board of Trustees of White Haven Center,Board of Trustees of Woodhaven Center,Board of Trustees of South Mountain Restoration Center.In the Department of General Services,Board of Commissioners of Public Grounds and Buildings,State Art Commission;In the Department of Revenue,State Athletic Commission;In the Department of Commerce,Navigation Commission for the Delaware River and its navigable tributaries;In the Department of Highways,State Highway Commission.In the Department of Transportation,Hazardous Substances Transportation Board,In the Department of Environmental [Resources,Environmental Quality Board,] Protection,Environmental Hearing Board,State Board for Certification of Sewage Treatment andWaterworks Operators,State Soil and Water Conservation Commission,Anthracite Mine Inspectors,Bituminous Mine Inspectors.20250SB0681PN0773 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 In the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs,Bureau of Prevention and Intervention,Bureau of Treatment,Bureau of Administration.All of the foregoing departmental administrative boards and commissions shall be organized or reorganized as provided in this act.Section 448. Advisory Boards and Commissions.--The advisory boards and commissions, within the several administrative departments, shall be constituted as follows:* * *(p) The Citizens Advisory Council shall be an independent advisory council administratively housed within the Department of Environmental Protection and shall consist of the Secretary of Environmental Protection who shall serve in an ex officio capacity, six members who shall be appointed by the Governor, no more than three of whom shall be of the same political party, six members who shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, no more than three of whom shall be of the same political party, and six members who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives no more than three of whom shall be of the same political party. The appointed members of the council shall be citizens of the State, who, during their respective terms, shall hold no other State office to which any salary is attached [except that of membership on the Environmental Quality Board].The term of office of each appointed member shall be three years, measured from the third Tuesday of January of the year in which he takes office, or until his successor has been appointed; except that in the initial appointments of the 20250SB0681PN0773 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members of the council, the respective appointing authorities shall appoint two members for terms of one year each, two members for terms of two years each, and two members for terms of three years each.The Citizens Advisory Council shall include persons knowledgeable in fields related to the work of the Department of Environmental Resources such as, but not limited to, ecology, limnology, toxicology, pharmacology, organiculture, and industrial technology.The council shall annually elect one of its appointed members as chairman and shall elect a secretary who need not be a member of the council. Meetings of the council shall be held at least quarterly or at the call of the chairman.The council shall have the sole power to employ and fix the compensation of an executive director and such experts, stenographers, and assistants as may be deemed necessary to carry out the work of the council, but due diligence shall be exercised by the council to enlist such voluntary assistance as may be available from citizens, research organizations, and other agencies in Pennsylvania or elsewhere, generally recognized as qualified to aid the council.Section 2. Section 471 of the act is repealed:[Section 471. Environmental Quality Board.--The Environmental Quality Board shall consist of the Secretary of Environmental Resources, who shall be chairman thereof, the Secretary of Health, the Secretary of Commerce, the Secretary of Transportation, the Secretary of Agriculture, the Secretary of Labor and Industry, the Secretary of Community Affairs, the Executive Director of the Fish Commission, the Executive Director of the Game Commission, the Chairman of the Public 20250SB0681PN0773 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Utilities Commission, the Executive Director of the State Planning Board, the Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, five members of the Citizens Advisory Council, and four members of the General Assembly. The Citizens Advisory Council members shall be designated by, and serve at the pleasure of, the Citizens Advisory Council. One of the General Assembly members shall be designated by, and serve at the pleasure of, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one by the Minority Leader of the Senate, one by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. In addition to the heads of the various departments as elsewhere in this act provided, the other members of the board may have named alternates to serve in their stead, the alternates for the members of the board from the Citizens Advisory Council to be selected by that council from members of the council and each other alternate to be selected by that particular member of the board in whose stead he is to serve. No person will serve as alternate for more than one board member.Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum.]Section 3. Sections 1715(b)(2), 1920-A and 1930-A of the act are amended to read:Section 1715. Seasonal Farm Labor.--* * *(b) The Secretary of Agriculture shall have the power and the secretary's duty shall be:* * *(2) To exercise the powers and duties vested by law and imposed upon the former Environmental Quality Board as specifically [set forth] specified in the "Seasonal Farm Labor Act."20250SB0681PN0773 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1920-A. [Environmental Quality Board] Department of Environmental Protection.--(a) The [Environmental Quality Board] department shall have the responsibility for developing a master environmental plan for the Commonwealth.(b) The [Environmental Quality Board] department shall have the power and [its duties shall be] duty to formulate, adopt and promulgate [such] rules and regulations [as may be determined by the board] for the proper performance of the work of the department[, and such rules and regulations, when made by the board, shall become the rules and regulations of the department] in adherence to the law as written and not as interpreted by the department.(c) The [board] department shall continue to exercise [any] the power to formulate, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations[, heretofore] previously vested in the [several] persons, departments, boards and commissions [set forth in section 1901-A. of this act, and any such rules] specified under section 1901-A. Rules and regulations promulgated prior to the effective date of this act shall be the rules and regulations of the [Department of Environmental Resources] department until [such time as] they are modified or repealed by the [Environmental Quality Board] department.(d) The [board] department shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, records and papers and upon certification to it of failure to obey [any such] the subpoena the Commonwealth Court is empowered after hearing to enter, when proper, an adjudication of contempt and [such] any other order as the circumstances require.[(e) The board shall receive and review reports from the Department of Environmental Resources and shall advise the 20250SB0681PN0773 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department and the Secretary of Environmental Resources on matters of policy.](f) The [board] department shall establish [such] rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the control, management, protection, utilization, development, occupancy and use of the lands and resources of State parks[, as it may deem necessary to conserve the interests of the Commonwealth. Such]. The rules and regulations shall be compatible with the purposes for which State parks are created and strictly adhere to State law. Whenever the [board] department imposes fees or charges for activities, admissions, uses or privileges, including charges for concessions, at or relating to State parks, [such] the charges or fees shall be used solely for the acquisition, maintenance, operation or administration of the State parks systems, and are hereby appropriated for [such] those purposes. The [board] department shall not adopt or impose any charges or fees for parking or general admission to State parks unless the charges were imposed prior to January 1, 1984. The [board] department may continue to impose and modify parking charges and fees applicable to specific services or units within the State park system which were imposed prior to January 1, 1984, and may impose charges or fees for admission to and for use of specific services and facilities in State parks.(g) The [board] department shall establish [such] rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the control, management, protection, utilization, development, occupancy[,] and use[,] of the lands and resources of the State forests[, as the department deems proper, to conserve the interests of the Commonwealth. Such]. The rules and regulations shall be compatible with the purposes for which the State forests are 20250SB0681PN0773 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 created, namely to provide a continuous supply of timber, lumber, wood[,] and other forest products, to protect the watersheds, conserve the waters, [and] regulate the flow of rivers and streams of [the State] this Commonwealth and [to furnish opportunities for healthful recreation to the public] maintain and manage existing public recreation opportunities.(h) [Any] A person may petition the [Environmental Quality Board] department to initiate a rule making proceeding for the issuance, amendment or repeal of a regulation administered and enforced by the department.(i) The [chairman of the Environmental Quality Board] secretary may suspend any regulation promulgated solely to meet a requirement of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977[, Public Law 95-87] (Public Law 95-87, 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.), when the requirement is no longer binding upon Pennsylvania. Notice of the suspension shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Within sixty days after the suspension, the [Environmental Quality Board] department shall reconsider the suspended regulation and shall promulgate, amend or repeal the regulation pursuant to the requirements of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(j) The [board] department shall promulgate regulations under the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as "The Clean Streams Law," or other laws of this Commonwealth that require that the water quality criteria for manganese established under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 93 (relating to water quality standards) shall be met, consistent with the exception in 25 Pa. Code § 96.3(d) (relating to water quality protection requirements). Within ninety days of the effective date of this 20250SB0681PN0773 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection, the [board] department shall promulgate proposed regulations.(k) The following apply:(1) The powers and duties vested in the Environmental Quality Board are transferred to the department, which shall exercise the powers and perform the duties that the Environmental Quality Board exercised or performed prior to the effective date of this subsection.(2) Any reference to the Environmental Quality Board under a statute or regulation that was in effect before the effective date of this subsection shall be deemed a reference to the department.(3) All personnel, allocations, appropriations, equipment, files, records, contracts, agreements, obligations and other materials used, employed or expended by the Environmental Quality Board are transferred to the department. Any contract, agreement or obligation incurred or entered into by the Environmental Quality Board shall be deemed to have been incurred or entered into by the department.(4) Any personnel transferred from the Environmental Quality Board to the department shall retain any civil service employment status assigned to the personnel.(l) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection.Section 1930-A. Powers of [Environmental Quality Board] Department of Environmental Protection.--The [Environmental 20250SB0681PN0773 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Quality Board] Department of Environmental Protection shall have the power and [its] duty [shall be] to review any petition submitted to it to designate an area as unsuitable for surface mining as provided for in section 315(h) through (n) of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as "The Clean Streams Law," and make designations [pursuant thereto] under that act: Provided, however, That the [board or the] Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection shall not make [such] the designations for surface mining operations regulated by the act of December 19, 1984 (P.L.1093, No.219), known as the "Noncoal Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act." This section shall not apply to any petition to designate an area as unsuitable for noncoal mining operations filed with the Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection prior to July 30, 1992.Section 4. All acts or parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 5. All activities regarding the powers and duties of the Environmental Quality Board that were initiated before the effective date of this section shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed by the Department of Environmental Protection. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions that were made under the authority of the Environmental Quality Board and that were in effect on the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified by the Department of Environmental Protection. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into by the Environmental Quality Board are not affected nor impaired by the transfer of the powers and duties of the Environmental Quality Board to the 20250SB0681PN0773 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Environmental Protection.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0681PN0773 - 14 - 12